Texas statutes.
CIVIL PRACTICE AND REMEDIES CODE

TITLE 6. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 150A. DISCOVERY BY GOVERNMENTAL UNIT

Sec. 150A.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Governmental unit" has the meaning assigned by Section 101.001.

(2) "Religious organization" means an organization that qualifies as a religious organization under Section 11.20, Tax Code.

(3) "Religious worship" has the meaning assigned by Section 11.20, Tax Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 39 (S.B. 24), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2017.

Sec. 150A.002. SERMONS PRIVILEGED FROM DISCLOSURE TO GOVERNMENTAL UNIT. A governmental unit may not, in any civil action or other civil or administrative proceeding to which the governmental unit is a party, compel the production or disclosure of a written copy or audio or video recording of a sermon delivered by a religious leader during religious worship of a religious organization or compel the religious leader to testify regarding the sermon.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 39 (S.B. 24), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2017.